California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(1) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments. 

(2) For the
 payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare, pension, or retirement plan.

(3) For any purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [25301. - 25392.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [25301. - 25306.]

25301.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them, provided that the adoption, terms and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district, a majority of who are represented by a labor organization in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 25051) of this part, shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such labor organization and the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25303.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25304.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administration of the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25305.

Nothing in this chapter prevents a district from participating in and making all or part of its employees members of the State Employees’ Retirement System by contract entered into between the district and the board of administration of the system under the State Employees’ Retirement Law or from participating in the Federal Social Security Act, or from participating in the retirement system of any other public agency for which it is eligible, and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient for such participation. Such participation shall not be considered as establishing a retirement system subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25306.

The board may classify and determine the officers and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory. The retirement system shall not apply to elective officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [25331. - 25337.]

25331.

(a) The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts of the benefits.

(b) If a former employee is elected as a board member, the retirement system shall not apply to their service on the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 14.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25332.

The retirement allowance may be predicated in part upon service rendered the district or any predecessor public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, acquired by the district in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, by a member prior to the establishment of the retirement system, which service is known as “prior service.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25333.

The board may require the district to contribute the entire cost of the retirement system or may require an officer or employee of the district, upon becoming a member of the retirement system, to contribute a portion of the cost, as permitted or required by law. The amount of the officer or employee contribution shall be determined by the board, as permitted or required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 15.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25334.

All members of the retirement system shall contribute in the manner and amount fixed by the board and such contributions may be collected by deducting the amounts thereof from the salary, wages, or compensation due such members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25335.

Liabilities accruing under the retirement system because of benefits other than such as are the equivalent of contributions by the members, with accumulated interest, shall be met by contributions by the district. Prior service or other liabilities of the district may be met by annual appropriations instead of by one appropriation for the total of the liabilities; but until the present value of regular contributions for current service, together with assets then available, equals the present value of all allowances and benefits granted or to be granted under the system, the appropriation for any one year when added to any unused balance of any previous appropriations for
 such purpose shall not be less than the amount disbursed during that year on account of prior service or other liabilities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25336.

If any member withdraws from the retirement system prior to retirement the total amount contributed by him with such interest as may be credited thereto shall be returned to him; provided, however, that the board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which a member, whose district service is terminated except by death or retirement, may elect to leave his contributions and interest thereon in the retirement fund, and the terms and conditions upon which a retirement allowance may be made to him after such termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25337.

All money received by any person as an annuity, pension, retirement allowance, disability payment, or death benefit from the retirement system, and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of the retirement system, whether in the actual possession of such person or deposited, loaned, or invested by him, is unassignable, and is exempt from execution or any other process except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 165.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [25361. - 25364.]

25361.

The board, upon establishing a retirement system pursuant to this chapter, shall create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25362.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25363.

The retirement board shall determine the eligibility of officers, employees, and their dependents to participation in the system and shall be the sole authority and judge under such ordinances as may be adopted by the board as to the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and continue to receive benefits of any sort under the retirement system, and may modify allowances for service and disability. The determination of the retirement board shall be final and conclusive and shall not be modified or set aside except for fraud or abuse of discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25364.

If the district maintains its own retirement fund, the retirement board shall have exclusive control of the administration, investment, and disbursement of the retirement fund. The retirement fund is a trust fund held for the exclusive purposes of providing benefits to members of the retirement system and their survivors and beneficiaries. Investment of the fund is subject to the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like
 aims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigation and Penalties [25391. - 25392.]

25391.

At least once in each four-year period after the establishment of the retirement system the board shall cause to be made an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement fund, and upon the basis of such investigation and valuation shall make such revision or change of the rates of contribution, the periods and conditions of service, and amounts of retirement allowances as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25392.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board or of the retirement board, nor any member of the retirement system or employee of the district, shall have any interest direct or indirect in the making of any investment or in the gains or profits accruing therefrom, and no such person, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent or partner of others, shall borrow any of its funds, nor shall any such person in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board, nor shall such a person become an endorser or surety as to, or in any manner an obligor for investments of the retirement
 fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [25701. - 25951.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [25701. - 25703.]

25701.

A district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25702.

A district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25703.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this division. The district, in exercising such power, shall in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [25721. - 25722.]

25721.

A district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.

Neither the general manager nor any director of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom. Any violation of this provision is a misdemeanor, and conviction shall work a forfeiture of office. This section has no application to contracts awarded to corporations in which such officer owns less than 1 percent of the entire capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [25771. - 25772.]

25771.

A district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25772.

Whenever the board by resolution determines that any record, map, book, or paper in the possession of the district or any officer or employee thereof is of no further value to the district, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [25801. - 25816.]

25801.

A district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights of way, rail lines, bus lines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided, that installations in state freeways shall be subject to the approval of the State
 Department of Public Works and installations in other state highways shall be subject to Article 2, Chapter 3, Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25802.

A district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitation by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperate with and accept cooperation from the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency of the state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such transit
 facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

25803.

A district shall not interfere with or exercise any control over any transit facilities now or hereafter owned and operated wholly or partly within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25804.

A district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25805.

A district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the State, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the State. The district shall with respect to the operation of any rail facilities maintain the area of the street or public highway between such rails and for two feet on either side thereof and shall upon removal of such rails restore any such street or public highway to a like condition as the surrounding street or
 highway area, all in accordance with local ordinances. The district shall not use any street or public highway in a manner to unnecessarily impair its usefulness. The district shall upon acquiring by condemnation or otherwise the facilities of a private transit company assume any and all obligations of such private company to maintain, repair or replace any street, public highway or part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25806.

A district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25807.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

25808.

The board of supervisors of a county or a city and county, or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25809.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Section 25808 the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 days nor more than 60 days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting such hearing and shall be published by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25810.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city council eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25811.

The district, petitioner or petitioners, and the intervenors shall have the right to call and examine witnesses; to introduce exhibits; to cross-examine opposing witnesses on any matter relevant to the issues even though that matter was not covered in direct examination; and to rebut evidence introduced by other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25812.

Oral evidence shall be taken only on oath or affirmation. The hearing need not be conducted according to technical rules relating to evidence and witnesses. Any relevant evidence shall be admitted if it is the sort of evidence on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious business affairs, regardless of the existence of any common law or statutory rule which might make improper the admission of such evidence over objection in a civil action. Hearsay evidence may be used for the purpose of supplementing or explaining any direct evidence but shall not be sufficient in itself to support a finding unless it would be admissible over objection in
 a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25813.

The general counsel for the district shall be present at the hearing and shall advise the board on matters of law, and shall render other assistance that may be requested by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 16.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25814.

A complete record of all proceedings and testimony before the board at such hearing shall be taken down by a reporter appointed by the board. In case an action is brought to review any decision of the board, a transcript of such testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof introduced, together with the written request for hearing and other proceedings in the cause shall constitute the record on review; provided, however, that the board and other parties may stipulate in writing that a specified portion of the evidence be certified to the court for judgment and in such case the portion of the evidence specified and the stipulation specifying such evidence shall
 be the record on review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25815.

Within 30 days after submission of the case the board shall render its decision in writing together with written findings of fact. Copies of the findings and decision shall be sent forthwith to the petitioners and intervenors by registered mail, postage prepaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25816.

Within 40 days after the mailing of the decision to the petitioner, the petitioner may apply for a writ of mandate in the manner provided in the Code of Civil Procedure. The complete record of the proceedings, or such parts thereof as are designated by the petitioner, shall be prepared by the district and shall be delivered to the petitioner within 30 days after a request therefor, upon payment of the expense of preparation and certification thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [25841. - 25849.]

25841.

A district may borrow money and incur indebtedness, and may issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness. No indebtedness shall be incurred exceeding the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district without the approval of a two-thirds vote of the voters voting on the proposition to incur such indebtedness; except that a further vote of the voters is not required for any indebtedness incurred within the purposes and not exceeding the available amount of any previously authorized bond issue, and as to such indebtedness the proceeds of any of the bonds unexpended in the treasury of the district, or the par value of any of the bonds which are unsold shall be deemed
 a part of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25841.5.

A district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of a district lawfully incurred after the commencement of the fiscal year, but prior to the time moneys from the tax levy for the fiscal year are received by a district, in a sum which shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in a district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and may evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed six (6) percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the tax levy from the then current fiscal year, which levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment
 of the notes and the interest thereon. The form of said notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing at Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The maturity of said notes shall not exceed two (2) years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25842.

No district shall incur an indebtedness for public works which in the aggregate exceeds 20 percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25843.

Indebtedness which has been incurred for the acquisition, construction, and operation of transit facilities, where the revenue from the transit facilities for three years or more next preceding has been sufficient to pay the interest and principal due on any bonds issued for its construction or acquisition, in addition to the cost of operation and maintenance, shall not be counted and included in ascertaining the limit of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25844.

A district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this division requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this State in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such transit facilities. A district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

25845.

The district may purchase equipment such as cars, trolley buses and motorbuses, and rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of rolling equipment and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon the terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. All money required to be paid by the district pursuant to the agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates provided for in this section shall be payable solely from the revenue or income to be derived from the transit facilities
 and from grants and loans as provided in Section 25844. Payment for equipment, or the rental of equipment, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable solely from revenue or income as provided in this section, and title to the equipment shall not vest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25846.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company, duly authorized to transact business in the State of California, as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct the trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25847.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds. The agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain such covenants, conditions and provisions as may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from the revenue or income to be derived from the transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25848.

The covenants, conditions and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25849.

An executed copy of each agreement or lease shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State, who will be entitled to receive one dollar ($1) for each copy filed with him and which filing shall constitute notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser. Each vehicle so purchased or leased shall have the name of the owner or lessor plainly marked on both sides thereof, followed by the appropriate words, “owner and lessor” or “owner and vendor,” as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investments [25871. - 25874.]

25871.

A district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(e) In any investment or deposit in which a city, county, or local public agency may place its funds pursuant to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

25872.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25873.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25874.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall from time to time be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Taxation [25891. - 25904.]

25891.

A district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25892.

If, in the opinion of the board, the revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25892.1.

(a) The district board may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, or any portion of the district that is coterminous with the boundaries of a city or the boundaries of contiguous cities, including any properties added to the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(b) The proceeds of the special taxes shall be used to provide, within the area taxed, for the operation, maintenance, or acquisition of any public improvement or utility for transportation purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25893.

The board shall, at the time of fixing the general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax
 shall be levied and collected annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25894.

The taxes required to be levied and collected on account of interest, principal, and sinking fund of district bonds shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes, and shall be collected at the time and in the same manner as other district taxes are collected, and be used for no other purpose than the payment of the bonds and accruing interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25895.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25896.

The board may elect to avail itself of the assessments made by the assessors of the counties in which the district is situated, and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for those counties, and may take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the county officials if the board declares its election so to do by resolution or ordinance and files a certified copy of the resolution or ordinance on or before the first day of August with the auditors of the counties in which the district is situated. Thereafter, each year and until otherwise provided by the board, all assessments shall be made for the district by
 the State Board of Equalization and the county assessors, and all taxes shall be collected for the district by the tax collectors, of the counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25897.

In such case the county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 25896 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25898.

In case the board elects to avail itself of the assessments referred to in Section 25896 it shall, on or before the first weekday in September, or if such weekday falls upon a holiday then on the first business day thereafter, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each hundred dollars, using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditors, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25899.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditors of the counties in which the district is situated a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25900.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes. The district may adopt the alternative procedure of tax collection and apportionment established by Chapter 3, Part 8, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and any amendments thereof; provided, however, that the district may thereafter abandon said alternative procedure at the end of any fiscal year of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25901.

Whenever any real property situate in any district which has availed itself of the provisions of Section 25896 has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurers receiving it in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25902.
